Indiana, session 2026, HB1426.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-31-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.139-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 2. The commission shall
establish standards for persons required to be certified or licensed by
the commission to provide emergency medical services. To be certified
or licensed, a person must meet the following minimum requirements:
(1) The personnel certified or licensed under this chapter must do
the following:
(A) Meet the standards for education and training established
by the commission by rule.
(B) Successfully complete a basic or an inservice course of
education and training on sudden infant death syndrome that
is certified by the commission in conjunction with the state
health commissioner.
(C) Successfully complete a basic or an inservice course of
education and training on autism that is certified by the
commission.
2026 IN 1426—LS 6809/DI 92


(D) Successfully complete a research based training program
concerning suicide assessment, treatment, and management
that is:
(i) demonstrated to be an effective or promising program;
and
(ii) recommended by the Indiana Suicide Prevention
Network Advisory Council.
(E) After December 31, 2024, complete basic training, which
may be completed online or by other means of virtual
instruction, that addresses the mental health and wellness of
persons required to be licensed under this chapter, including:
(i) healthy coping skills to preserve the mental health of
persons required to be licensed under this chapter and
manage the stress and trauma related to the provision of
emergency medical services;
(ii) recognition of symptoms of posttraumatic stress disorder
and signs of suicidal behavior; and
(iii) information on mental health resources available for
persons required to be licensed under this chapter.
(F) After December 31, 2025, successfully complete a basic
training, which may be completed online or by other
means of virtual instruction, on Alzheimer's disease and
dementia that is certified by the commission.
(2) Ambulances to be used must conform with the requirements
of the commission and must either be:
(A) covered by insurance issued by a company licensed to do
business in Indiana in the amounts and under the terms
required in rules adopted by the commission; or
(B) owned by a governmental entity covered under IC 34-13-3.
(3) Emergency ambulance service shall be provided in accordance
with rules adopted by the commission. However, the rules
adopted under this chapter may not prohibit the dispatch of an
ambulance to aid an emergency patient because an emergency
medical technician is not immediately available to staff the
ambulance.
(4) Ambulances must be equipped with a system of emergency
medical communications approved by the commission. The
emergency medical communication system must properly
integrate and coordinate appropriate local and state emergency
communications systems and reasonably available area
emergency medical facilities with the general public's need for
emergency medical services.
2026 IN 1426—LS 6809/DI 92


(5) Emergency medical communications shall be provided in
accordance with rules adopted by the commission.
(6) A nontransporting emergency medical services vehicle must
conform with the commission's requirements.
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-10.5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 209, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 7. (a) The
education board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing
minimum basic training requirements for full-time firefighters and
volunteer firefighters, subject to subsection (b) and section 7.5 of this
chapter. The requirements must include training in the following areas:
(1) Orientation.
(2) Personal safety.
(3) Forcible entry.
(4) Ventilation.
(5) Apparatus.
(6) Ladders.
(7) Self-contained breathing apparatus.
(8) Hose loads.
(9) Streams.
(10) Basic recognition of special hazards.
(b) A person who fulfills the certification requirements for:
(1) Firefighter I; or
(2) Firefighter II;
is considered to comply with the requirements established under
subsection (a).
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (d), and (f),
the minimum basic training requirements for full-time firefighters and
volunteer firefighters must include successful completion of a basic or
inservice course of education and training on sudden infant death
syndrome that is certified by the Indiana emergency medical services
commission (created under IC 16-31-2-1) in conjunction with the state
health commissioner.
(d) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (c), and (f),
the minimum basic training requirements for full-time and volunteer
firefighters must include successful completion of an instruction course
on vehicle emergency response driving safety. The education board
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to operate this course.
(e) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (c), (d), and
(f), the minimum basic training requirements for full-time and
volunteer firefighters must include successful completion of a basic or
inservice course of education and training in interacting with
2026 IN 1426—LS 6809/DI 92


individuals with autism that is certified by the Indiana emergency
medical services commission (created under IC 16-31-2-1).
(f) This subsection does not apply to volunteer firefighters. After
December 31, 2024, in addition to the requirements of subsections (a),
(c), (d), and (e), the minimum basic training requirement for full-time
firefighters must include training, which may be completed online or
by other means of virtual instruction, that addresses the mental health
and wellness of firefighters, including:
(1) healthy coping skills to preserve the mental health of
firefighters and to manage the stress and trauma related to
employment as a firefighter;
(2) recognition of:
(A) symptoms of posttraumatic stress disorder; and
(B) signs of suicidal behavior; and
(3) information on mental health resources available for
firefighters.
(g) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (c), (d),
(e), and (f), the minimum basic training requirements for full-time
and volunteer firefighters must include successful completion of a
basic or inservice course of education and training in interacting
with individuals with Alzheimer's disease and dementia that is
certified by the Indiana emergency medical services commission
created by IC 16-31-2-1.
(g) (h) The education board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
concerning the adoption of the most current edition of the following
National Fire Protection Association standards, subject to amendment
by the board:
(1) NFPA 472.
(2) NFPA 1001.
(3) NFPA 1002.
(4) NFPA 1003.
(5) NFPA 1006.
(6) NFPA 1021.
(7) NFPA 1031.
(8) NFPA 1033.
(9) NFPA 1035.
(10) NFPA 1041.
(11) NFPA 1521.
(12) NFPA 1670.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1426—LS 6809/DI 92